Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.060

Immunization program—Purpose.

In enacting RCW 28A.210.060 through 28A.210.170, it is the judgment of the legislature that it is necessary to protect the health of the public and individuals by providing a means for the eventual achievement of full immunization of school-age children against certain vaccine-preventable diseases.

[ 1990 c 33 s 190; 1984 c 40 s 3; 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.31.100.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 40: See note following RCW 28A.195.050.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 118: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on September 1, 1979." [ 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 13.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 118: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 16.]

Immunization plan: RCW 43.70.525.